Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2077.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 53 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 5510.12. Parking tickets.(a) Limitation on parking tickets.--A parking entity, municipality, authority or the Commonwealth may not issue more than one parking ticket per vehicle per day.(b) Limitation on fines.--A parking entity, municipality, authority or the Commonwealth may not impose a fine for a delinquent parking ticket until 14 days after the payment of the parking ticket was due.(c) Rate enforcement.--A parking entity or authority shall not change parking rates and hours of rate enforcement without the approval of the municipality.123456789101112131415161718 (d) Limitation on financial incentives.--A parking entity, municipality, authority or the Commonwealth may not give performance evaluations, pay raises, bonuses or other financial incentives to employees based on the number of tickets or parking violations issued.(e) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Parking entity." A company that has contracted with an authority, municipality or the Commonwealth to enforce parking violations, issue parking tickets, manage parking lots or other parking-related activities.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB2077PN2660 - 2 - 12345678910111213